Illinois, session 104th, SB700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Down Syndrome Information and Awareness Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 511/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be known as the the Down 8Syndrome Information and Awareness Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-142, eff. 1-1-16.)